Connecticut, session 2026, HB05021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 219 of the general statutes be amended to exempt from
the sales and use taxes the sale of and the storage, use or other
consumption in this state of articles of children's clothing costing under
one hundred dollars.